nl: Afstempelingstype eerstedagenvelop: Puntstempel; Duplexstempel; Eerstedagstempel (officieel); Handstempel; Machinestempel; Geïllustreerde stempel; Sloganstempel; Gelegenheidsstempel; Overige
cs: Typ razítka na obálce prvního dne: Razítko typu býčí oko; Dvojité razítko; Oficiální razítko dne vydání; Ruční razítko; Strojové razítko; Obrazové razítko; Propagační razítko; Příležitostné razítko; Jiné
de: Entwertungsart des Ersttagsbriefs: Zentrischer Stempel; Doppelstempel; Offizieller Ersttagsstempel; Handstempel; Maschinenstempel; Sonderstempel; Werbestempel; Gelegenheitsstempel; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de carimbo do envelope de primeiro dia: Carimbo bullseye; Carimbo duplex; Carimbo de primeiro dia de circulação (oficial); Carimbo manual; Carimbo de máquina; Carimbo ilustrado; Carimbo com slogan; Carimbo de evento especial; Outros
vi: Loại đóng dấu bưu chính trên bì thư ngày đầu tiên: Dấu hủy mắt bò; Dấu hủy kép; Dấu hủy ngày phát hành đầu tiên (chính thức); Dấu hủy đóng bằng tay; Dấu hủy đóng bằng máy; Dấu hủy hình ảnh; Dấu hủy khẩu hiệu; Dấu hủy sự kiện đặc biệt; Khác
sk-SK: Typ zrušenia obálky prvého dňa: Stredová pečiatka; Duplexná pečiatka; Oficiálna pečiatka prvého dňa vydania; Ručná pečiatka; Strojová pečiatka; Obrazová pečiatka; Propagačná pečiatka; Príležitostná pečiatka; Iné
da: Stempeltype på førstedagsomslag: Bullseye-stempel; Duplex-stempel; Officielt førstedagsstempel; Håndstempel; Maskinstempel; Motivstempel; Sloganstempel; Særstempel; Andet
fr: Type d’oblitération de l’enveloppe premier jour: Oblitération œil-de-bœuf; Oblitération duplex; Oblitération premier jour d’émission (officielle); Oblitération manuelle; Oblitération mécanique; Oblitération illustrée; Oblitération avec slogan; Oblitération d’événement spécial; Autre
hu: Elsőnapi bélyegzés típusa: Központos bélyegzés; Duplex bélyegzés; Kibocsátás első napja (hivatalos) bélyegzés; Kézi bélyegzés; Gépi bélyegzés; Alkalmi rajzos bélyegzés; Reklámszöveges bélyegzés; Különleges esemény bélyegzés; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип гашение на първодневен плик: Кръгло клеймо; Двойно клеймо; Клеймо за първи ден на издаване (официално); Ръчно клеймо; Машинно клеймо; Илюстровано клеймо; Клеймо с надпис; Клеймо за специално събитие; Друго
ko: 초일봉투 소인 유형: 불스아이 소인; 듀플렉스 소인; 초일 발행(공식) 소인; 수기 소인; 기계 소인; 그림 소인; 슬로건 소인; 특별 행사 소인; 기타
fi: Ensipäivänkuoren postileiman tyyppi: Häränsilmäleima; Kaksoisleima; Ensipäivänleima (virallinen); Käsileima; Koneleima; Kuvioleima; Mainosleima; Erikoisleima (tapahtuma); Muu
th: ประเภทการประทับตราวันแรกจำหน่าย: รอยประทับตราวงแหวน; รอยประทับตราแบบคู่; รอยประทับตราวางจำหน่ายวันแรก (เป็นทางการ); รอยประทับตราด้วยมือ; รอยประทับตราด้วยเครื่อง; รอยประทับตราแบบรูปภาพ; รอยประทับตราแบบข้อความ; รอยประทับตราวาระพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de cancelación de sobre de primer día: Cancelación de ojo de buey; Cancelación dúplex; Cancelación oficial de primer día de emisión; Cancelación manual; Cancelación a máquina; Cancelación pictórica; Cancelación de eslogan; Cancelación de evento especial; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de anulare a primei zile de acoperire: Ștampilă bullseye; Ștampilă duplex; Ștampilă (oficială) prima zi a emisiunii; Ștampilă manuală; Ștampilă mecanică; Ștampilă ilustrată; Ștampilă cu slogan; Ștampilă pentru eveniment special; Altele
ja: 初日カバーキャンセルタイプ: ブルズアイ消印; デュプレックス消印; 発行初日 (公式) 消印; 手押し消印; 機械消印; 風景印; 標語印; 特印 (特別行事消印); その他
nb: Type avbestilling av første dagsdekning: Senterstempling; Dupleks-stempel; Førstedagsstempel (offisielt); Håndstempel; Maskinstempel; Motivstempel; Slagordstempel; Spesialstempel; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta otkazivanja naslovnice prvog dana: Kružni žig; Dvostruki žig; Službeni žig prvog dana izdanja; Ručni žig; Strojni žig; Prigodni slikovni žig; Sloganski žig; Žig za posebne događaje; Ostalo
en: First day cover cancellation type: Bullseye cancel; Duplex cancel; First day of issue (official) cancel; Hand cancel; Machine cancel; Pictorial cancel; Slogan cancel; Special event cancel; Other
ru: Тип гашения конверта первого дня: Гашение типа «бычий глаз»; Двойное гашение; Официальное гашение первого дня; Ручное гашение; Машинное гашение; Художественное гашение; Сюжетное (слоганное) гашение; Гашение специального события; Другое
zh-TW: 首日封銷戳類型: 靶心戳; 雙重郵戳; 首日發行 (官方) 郵戳; 手工蓋戳; 機器蓋戳; 圖案郵戳; 宣傳郵戳; 特殊事件郵戳; 其他
tr: İlk gün teminat iptal türü: Boğa gözü damgası; Çiftli damga; İlk gün (resmi) damgası; El damgası; Makine damgası; Resimli damga; Slogan damgası; Özel etkinlik damgası; Diğer
el: Τύπος ακύρωσης κάλυψης πρώτης ημέρας: Ακυρωτική σφραγίδα Bullseye; Διπλή ακυρωτική σφραγίδα (duplex); Σφραγίδα πρώτης ημέρας κυκλοφορίας (επίσημη); Σφραγίδα χειρός; Μηχανική σφραγίδα; Εικονογραφημένη σφραγίδα; Σφραγίδα με σλόγκαν; Σφραγίδα ειδικής εκδήλωσης; Άλλο
lt-LT: Pirmosios dienos voko antspaudavimo tipas: Centrinis antspaudas; Dvigubas antspaudas; Pirmosios dienos (oficialus) antspaudas; Rankinis antspaudas; Mašininis antspaudas; Proginis antspaudas; Antspaudas su šūkiu; Specialaus įvykio antspaudas; Kita
sv: Stämpeltyp för förstadagskuvert: Bullseye-stämpel; Duplex-stämpel; Förstadagsstämpel (officiell); Handstämpel; Maskinstämpel; Motivstämpel; Sloganstämpel; Specialstämpel; Övrigt
pl: Rodzaj anulowania ubezpieczenia na pierwszy dzień: Stempel punktowy (bullseye); Stempel podwójny (duplex); Oficjalny stempel pierwszego dnia obiegu; Stempel ręczny; Stempel maszynowy; Stempel okolicznościowy z grafiką; Stempel z hasłem; Stempel okolicznościowy; Inny
pt-PT: Tipo de cancelamento da capa do primeiro dia: Oblitéração em alvo; Oblitéração dupla; Oblitéração oficial do primeiro dia de emissão; Oblitéração manual; Oblitéração mecânica; Oblitéração pictórica; Oblitéração com slogan; Oblitéração de evento especial; Outro
zh-CN: 首日盖销戳类型: 靶心戳; 双联戳; 首日发行（官方）邮戳; 手盖戳; 机器戳; 图案邮戳; 宣传戳; 纪念邮戳; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta odpovedi kritja za prvi dan: Središčni žig; Dvojni žig; Žig prvega dne izdaje (uradni); Ročni žig; Strojni žig; Slikovni žig; Žig s sloganom; Žig za posebne dogodke; Drugo
it: Tipo di cancellazione della copertura del primo giorno: Annullamento a occhio di bue; Annullamento duplex; Annullamento ufficiale del primo giorno di emissione; Annullamento manuale; Annullamento meccanico; Annullamento figurato; Annullamento con slogan; Annullamento per eventi speciali; Altro